test/src/morphology/verb-klasse2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gæljodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -æ-
    gæljodh+V+IV+Inf: båetedh
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gæljoem
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gæljoeh
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gylje
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gæljoen
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [gæljoden, gæljoejidien]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gæljoejægan
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [gæljobe, gæljoejibie]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gæljode, gæljoejidie]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gæljoeh
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [gæljoejim]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [gæljoejih]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [gæljoeji, gæljoej]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [gæljoejimen]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [gæljoejiden]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [gæljoejigan]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [gæljoejimh]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [gæljoejidh]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [gæljoejin]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gæljoeh
    gæljodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [gæljoden, gæljoejidien]
    gæljodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: gæljode
    gæljodh+V+IV+ConNeg: gæljoeh
    gæljodh+V+IV+Ger: gæljoeminie
    gæljodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: gyljeme
    gæljodh+V+IV+VGen: gæljoen
            
  Verb - tjearodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -ea-
    tjearodh+V+IV+Inf: tjearodh
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjearoem
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjearoeh
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjyöre
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjearoen
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [tjearoden, tjearoejidien]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjearoejægan
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tjearobe, tjearoejibie]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tjearode, tjearoejidie]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tjearoeh
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tjearoejim]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tjearoejih]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tjearoeji]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [tjearoejimen]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [tjearoejiden]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [tjearoejigan]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tjearoejimh]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tjearoejidh]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tjearoejin]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: tjearoeh
    tjearodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [tjearoden, tjearoejidien]
    tjearodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [tjearode, tjearoejidie]
    tjearodh+V+IV+ConNeg: tjearoeh
    tjearodh+V+IV+Ger: tjearoeminie
    tjearodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: tjyöreme
    tjearodh+V+IV+VGen: tjearoen   
    
  Verb - gaatodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -a-
    gaatodh+V+IV+Inf: gaatodh
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gaatoem
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gaatoeh
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gååte
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gaatoen
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [gaatoden, gaatoejidien]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gaatoejægan
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [gaatobe, gaatoejibie]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gaatode, gaatoejidie]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gaatoeh
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [gaatoejim]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [gaatoejih]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [gaatoeji]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [gaatoejimen]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [gaatoejiden]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [gaatoejigan]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [gaatoejimh]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [gaatoejidh]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [gaatoejin]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gaatoeh
    gaatodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [gaatoden, gaatoejidien]
    gaatodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [gaatode, gaatoejidie]
    gaatodh+V+IV+ConNeg: gaatoeh
    gaatodh+V+IV+Ger: gaatoeminie
    gaatodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: gååteme
    gaatodh+V+IV+VGen: gaatoen
        
        
  Verb - gåhtjodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -å-
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Inf: gåhtjodh
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gåhtjoem
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gåhtjoeh
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gohtje
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gåhtjoen
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [gåhtjoden, gåhtjoejidien]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gåhtjoejægan
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [gåhtjobe, gåhtjoejibie]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gåhtjode, gåhtjoejidie]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gåhtjoeh
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [gåhtjoejim]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [gåhtjoejih]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [gåhtjoeji, gåhtjoej]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [gåhtjoejimen]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [gåhtjoejiden]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [gåhtjoejigan]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [gåhtjoejimh]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [gåhtjoejidh]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [gåhtjoejin]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gåhtjoeh
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [gåhtjoden, gåhtjoejidien]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [gåhtjode, gåhtjoejidie]
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+ConNeg: gåhtjoeh
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+Ger: gåhtjoeminie
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: gohtjeme
    gåhtjodh+V+IV+VGen: gåhtjoen 
    
  Verb - varhtodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -a-
    varhtodh+V+IV+Inf: varhtodh
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varhtoem
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: varhtoeh
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vorhte
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: varhtoen
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [varhtoden, varhtoejidien]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: varhtoejægan
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [varhtobe, varhtoejibie]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [varhtode, varhtoejidie]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: varhtoeh
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [varhtoejim] 
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [varhtoejih]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [varhtoeji, varhtoej]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [varhtoejimen]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [varhtoejiden]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [varhtoejigan]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [varhtoejimh]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [varhtoejidh]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [varhtoejin]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: varhtoeh
    varhtodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [varhtoden, varhtoejidien]
    varhtodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [varhtode, varhtoejidie]
    varhtodh+V+IV+ConNeg: varhtoeh
    varhtodh+V+IV+Ger: varhtoeminie
    varhtodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vorhteme
    varhtodh+V+IV+VGen: varhtoen
        
  Verb - tråabpodh: # verb I, stem -oe, root vowel -åa-
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Inf: tråabpodh
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tråabpoem
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tråabpoeh
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: trååbpe
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: tråabpoen
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [tråabpoden, tråabpoejidien]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tråabpoejægan
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tråabpobe, tråabpoejibie]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tråabpode, tråabpoejidie]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tråabpoeh
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tråabpoejim] 
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tråabpoejih]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tråabpoeji, tråabpoej]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [tråaboejimen]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [tråabpoejiden]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [tråabpoejigan]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tråabpoejimh]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tråabpoejidh]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tråabpoejin]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: tråabpoeh
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [tråabpoden, tråabpoejidien]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [tråabpode, tråabpoejidie]
    tråabpodh+V+IV+ConNeg: tråabpoeh
    tråabpodh+V+IV+Ger: tråabpoeminie
    tråabpodh+V+IV+PrfPrc: trååbpeme
    tråabpodh+V+IV+VGen: tråabpoen
    
    
    

    
    
